District of Columbia statutes.
1-306.40

Comprehensive Plan Requirement.

Nothing in this part shall obviate the requirement that zoning shall not be inconsistent with the Comprehensive Plan. However, the Zoning Commission and the Mayor’s Office of Planning each shall consider an applicant’s compliance with the requirements of this part as supportive of the Comprehensive Plan and as providing public amenities associated with an applicant’s project.

Apr. 10, 1984, D.C. Law 5-76, § 3, 31 DCR 1049
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-275, § 2(a), 41 DCR 1499